Utah statutes.
78B-6-813.   Time for appeal.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), either party may, within 10 days, appeal from the judgment rendered.

(2)  In a nuisance action under Sections 78B-6-1107 through 78B-6-1114, any party may appeal from the judgment rendered within three days.

